Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.233

Payroll deductions for capitation payments to health maintenance organizations.

Any employee or retired employee of the state or its departments, agencies, or subdivisions and any employee or retired employee of a county, public or municipal corporation, school district, or tax supported institution may authorize the deduction from his or her salary or wages of the amount of his or her capitation payments to any health maintenance organization receiving a certificate of authority under this chapter. Upon the filing of an authorization with the auditor or fiscal officer of the employer, such auditor or fiscal officer shall make payments in favor of the health maintenance organizations referred to in the authorization for the amounts of the deductions authorized, *RCW 41.04.230(7) notwithstanding.

[ 2012 c 117 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 20.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.04.230 was amended by 1993 c 2 s 26 (Initiative Measure No. 134), and subsection (7) was deleted.